Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 1. Powers and Miscellaneous Matters

§ 15-1-101.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

15-1-101

through

15-11-302

:

“Any city or town” means any incorporated municipality;

“Councilman or councilmen” means the individuals elected to comprise the governing body of any city or town;

“Emergency ordinance” means an ordinance operating for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety or welfare, in which the emergency is defined;

“First class city” means any incorporated municipality having a population of four thousand (4,000) or more which has been declared a first class city or which has taken the necessary steps to be and has been proclaimed a first class city;

“Franchise” means the grant of authority to any person or firm by the governing body of any city or town to carry on the operation of a public utility;

“Governing body” means the council or commission constituting the elected legislative body of any city or town including the mayor who is the presiding officer;

“Local improvement” means any improvement made within any city or town, the cost of which may be assessed against the property specially benefited thereby;

“Mayor” means the person elected, either by popular vote or by vote of the governing body, to exercise the powers of the office and to be presiding officer of the governing body;

“Ordinance” means a legislative enactment of general effect validly adopted by the governing body of any city or town;

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation or other business entity, or the executor, administrator, trustee, receiver, assignee or personal representative thereof;

“Public improvement” means an improvement made within any city or town for which general bonded obligation may be incurred;

“Qualified elector” means any person possessing the requisite qualifications to vote in any election conducted within a city or town for the selection of mayors or councilmen;

“Qualified member” means any member of a governing body who was elected or appointed thereto in accordance with all applicable provisions of law;

“Town” means any incorporated municipality, not a first class city;

“This act”, unless otherwise specified, means W.S.

15-1-101

through

15-11-302

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-1; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 15, § 1; ch. 34, § 2; 2011, ch. 129, § 301.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (a) and in (a)(xv), substituted “15-11-302” for “15-10-117.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Authority to engage in collective bargaining. —

City's mayor and/or single council member could not negotiate with a firefighters' union because the mayor and/or single council member were not “corporate authorities,” with wage setting authority, so city council was required to negotiate with the union. Int'l Ass'n of Firefighters Local Union No. 279 v. City of Cheyenne, 2013 WY 157, 316 P.3d 1162,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2013).

Convictions in municipal courts for driving while intoxicated are for violations of ordinances

and not of state statutes, even if the state statute is copied verbatim in the ordinance or if it is adopted as the ordinance by reference. State ex rel. Motor Vehicle Div. v. Holtz, 674 P.2d 732,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1983).

Quoted

in

Carlson v. Bratton, 681 P.2d 1333,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

Collier v. Hilltop Nat'l Bank, 920 P.2d 1241,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 15-1-102.
Prior incorporations and elections legalized.

All incorporations and proceedings to incorporate cities and towns and all elections held in cities and towns, whether pursuant to the laws of the territory of Wyoming, or the state of Wyoming, are legalized, notwithstanding any irregularity that may have occurred.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-2; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.